testing/kom-tests.yaml
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Apr+Tra+PxPl1: тымӧдъясланьтіным
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Apr+Ter+PxPl1: тымӧдъясланьӧдзным
     тымӧд+N+Pl+PxPl2+Nom: тымӧдъясныд
     тымӧд+N+Pl+PxPl2+Gen: тымӧдъясныдлӧн
     тымӧд+N+Pl+PxPl2+Abl: тымӧдъясныдлысь
     тымӧд+N+Pl+PxPl2+Dat: тымӧдъясныдлы
     тымӧд+N+Pl+PxPl2+Acc: тымӧдъясныдтӧ
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Instr+PxPl2: тымӧдъяснаныд
     тымӧд+N+Pl+PxPl2+Com: тымӧдъясныдкӧд
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Car+PxPl2: тымӧдъястӧгныд
     тымӧд+N+Pl+PxPl2+Cns: тымӧдъясныдла
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Comp+PxPl2: тымӧдъяссяныд
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: тымӧдъясаныд
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: тымӧдъяссьыныд
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: тымӧдъясаныд
     тымӧд+N+Pl+PxPl2+Apr: тымӧдъясныдлань
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl2: тымӧдъяссяньныд
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: тымӧдъясӧдныд
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Tra+PxPl2: тымӧдъястіныд
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl2: тымӧдъясӧдзныд
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Apr+Ine+PxPl2: тымӧдъясланяныд
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Apr+Ela+PxPl2: тымӧдъясланьсьыныд
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Apr+Ill+PxPl2: тымӧдъясланяныд
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Apr+Egr+PxPl2: тымӧдъясланьсяньныд
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Apr+Prl+PxPl2: тымӧдъясланьӧдныд
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Apr+Tra+PxPl2: тымӧдъясланьтіныд
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Apr+Ter+PxPl2: тымӧдъясланьӧдзныд
     тымӧд+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom: тымӧдъясныс
     тымӧд+N+Pl+PxPl3+Gen: тымӧдъясныслӧн
     тымӧд+N+Pl+PxPl3+Abl: тымӧдъясныслысь
     тымӧд+N+Pl+PxPl3+Dat: тымӧдъясныслы
     тымӧд+N+Pl+PxPl3+Acc: тымӧдъяснысӧ
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Instr+PxPl3: тымӧдъяснаныс
     тымӧд+N+Pl+PxPl3+Com: тымӧдъясныскӧд
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Car+PxPl3: тымӧдъястӧгныс
     тымӧд+N+Pl+PxPl3+Cns: тымӧдъяснысла
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Comp+PxPl3: тымӧдъяссяныс
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: тымӧдъясаныс
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: тымӧдъяссьыныс
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: тымӧдъясаныс
     тымӧд+N+Pl+PxPl3+Apr: тымӧдъясныслань
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl3: тымӧдъясланьныс
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl3: тымӧдъяссяньныс
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: тымӧдъясӧдныс
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Tra+PxPl3: тымӧдъястіныс
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl3: тымӧдъясӧдзныс
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Apr+Ine+PxPl3: тымӧдъясланяныс
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Apr+Ela+PxPl3: тымӧдъясланьсьыныс
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Apr+Ill+PxPl3: тымӧдъясланяныс
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Apr+Egr+PxPl3: тымӧдъясланьсяньныс
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Apr+Prl+PxPl3: тымӧдъясланьӧдныс
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Apr+Tra+PxPl3: тымӧдъясланьтіныс
     тымӧд+N+Pl+Apr+Ter+PxPl3: тымӧдъясланьӧдзныс
